Mississippi, session 2026, HB841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds that innovative workforce training programs are critical to meeting the evolving needs of Mississippi employers and workers, and that performance-based financing models can expand access to training while safeguarding public funds.  The purpose of this act is to establish a zero-interest, performance-based forgivable loan program that incentivizes measurable employment outcomes and ensures responsible stewardship of taxpayer dollars. SECTION 2. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Workforce Innovation Performance Loan Fund", which shall consist of monies appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature, loan repayments, recaptured funds, grants, and any other funds designated for deposit therein.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  The fund shall be administered by the Mississippi Development Authority (MDA), in coordination with the Mississippi Department of Employment Security and other relevant agencies as determined by the MDA. Monies in the fund shall be expended by the MDA, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes provided in this section. (2)  Loans from the fund may be awarded to eligible applicants, including, but not limited to: (a)  Community and junior colleges; (b)  Institutions of higher learning; (c)  Nonprofit workforce training organizations domiciled in Mississippi; (d)  Public-private partnerships; and (e)  Other entities approved by the MDA that demonstrate capacity to deliver innovative workforce training. (3)  (a)  Loans made under this section shall be zero-interest loans. (b)  Loan amounts shall not be less than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) per approved project. (c)  Loan proceeds shall be used solely for eligible workforce training costs, including curriculum development, equipment, instruction, credentialing, and related program expenses. (4)  (a)  Loan forgiveness shall be based on verified employment placement outcomes achieved by program participants within a time period established by the MDA. (b)  Placement outcomes shall be verified through wage records, employer confirmation, or other documentation approved by the MDA. (c)  Loan forgiveness shall be determined as follows: (i)  Eighty percent (80%) or greater placement rate shall result in one hundred percent (100%) loan forgiveness; (ii)  Seventy percent (70%) but less than eighty percent (80%) placement rate shall result in partial loan forgiveness, the percentage of which shall be established by rule; and (iii)  Placement rates below seventy percent (70%) shall result in no loan forgiveness, and the outstanding balance shall be repaid in accordance with loan terms. (5)  (a)  Any portion of a loan not forgiven shall be repaid to the fund in accordance with repayment schedules established by the MDA. (b)  Repayments shall be deposited into the Mississippi Workforce Innovation Performance Loan Fund and made available for future loans. (c)  The MDA may take necessary actions to enforce repayment, consistent with state law and program rules. (6)  (a)  The MDA shall establish an application process, evaluation criteria, and approval procedures for loans issued under this act. (b)  Loan recipients shall submit periodic performance and financial reports as required by the MDA. (c)  The loan program and fund shall be subject to audit by the Office of the State Auditor. (7)  The MDA may promulgate rules, guidelines, and procedures necessary to implement and administer this act, including definitions, verification standards, forgiveness schedules, and enforcement provisions. (8)  This section shall be construed to promote innovation in workforce training while protecting taxpayer dollars through performance-based accountability. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.